cs: Obsah síry: Vysoký; Nízký; Velmi nízký; Jiné
sv: Svavelhalt: Hög; Låg; Ultralåg; Övrigt
pt-PT: Conteúdo de enxofre: Alto; Baixo; Ultrabaixo; Outro
zh-CN: 硫含量: 高; 低; 超低; 其他
hr-HR: Sadržaj sumpora: Visoki; Niski; Iznimno niski; Ostalo
da: Svovlindhold: Høj; Lav; Ultra-lav; Andet
ko: 황 함량: 높음; 낮음; 매우 낮음; 기타
it: Contenuto di zolfo: Alto; Basso; Ultra basso; Altro
fi: Rikkipitoisuus: Korkea; Matala; Erittäin matala; Muu
bg-BG: Съдържание на сяра: Висок; Нисък; Изключително нисък; Други
th: ปริมาณซัลเฟอร์: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; ต่ำมาก; อื่นๆ
hu: Kéntartalom: Magas; Alacsony; Ultraalacsony; Egyéb
en: Sulfur content: High; Low; Ultra-low; Other
de: Schwefelgehalt: Hoch; Niedrig; Sehr niedrig; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Teor de enxofre: Alta; Baixa; Ultrabaixo; Outro
ro-RO: Conținut de sulf: Ridicat; Scăzut; Foarte scăzut; Altele
vi: Hàm lượng lưu huỳnh: Cao; Trễ; Cực thấp; Khác
nb: Svovelinnhold: Høy; Lav; Ultralav; Annet
lt-LT: Sieros kiekis: Didelis; Mažas; Itin mažas; Kita
fr: Contient du soufre: Haute; Basse; Très basse; Autre
ru: Содержание серы: Высокое; Низкое; Крайне низкое; Другое
pl: Zawartość siarki: Wysoki; Niski; Ultra-niski; Inne
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε θείο: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Εξαιρετικά χαμηλή; Άλλο
tr: Sülfürlü İçerik: Yüksek; Düşük; Çok düşük; Diğer
es: Contenido de azufre: Alto; Bajo; Ultrabajo; Otros
sl-SI: Vsebnost žvepla: Visoka; Nizka; Izjemno nizka; Drugo
ja: 硫黄含有量: 高; 低; 超低; その他
zh-TW: 硫含量: 高; 低; 超低; 其他
sk-SK: Obsah síry: Vysoký; Nízky; Ultranízky; Iné
nl: Zwavelgehalte: Hoog; Laag; Ultra laag; Andere